Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3551
Administrator; period of authority; termination.

The administrator shall serve at the pleasure of the city council of the city or board of trustees of the village in which the community improvement district is located or until the district court shall terminate the authority of the city council or village board of trustees and the administrator. A petition for review by the court of the original order may be filed by any person with an interest in the community improvement district. The court shall have the power to terminate the authority of the city council or village board of trustees and the administrator upon its determination that none of the conditions set forth in section 18-3544 exist or it is in the best interest of the community improvement district that the authority of the administrator be terminated. A termination of the authority of the city council or village board of trustees and the administrator shall reinstate the authority of the board of trustees pursuant to the Community Improvement District Act.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 51.
April 17, 2026